North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 22E. Electioneering Communications. [Repealed]

§§ 163-278.80 through 163-278.89.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-170, s. 10, effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice [September 23, 2010].

History.
S. 163-278.80; 2004-125, s. 1; 2006-182, s. 1(a); 2009-534, s. 7(a), (b). s. 163-278.81; 2004-125, s. 1; 2005-430, s. 9(a); 2006-182, s. 2(a). s. 163-278.82; 2004-125, s. 1; 2005-430, s. 9(b); 2006-182, s. 3(a); 2008-150,
s. 10.3(a). s. 163-278.83; 2004-125, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 29(a). s. 163-278.84; 2009-534, s. 7(c); repealed by 2010-170, s. 10, effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice [September 23, 2010].

Article 22E Repealed Effective Upon Preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.

This article was repealed effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice by Session Laws 2010-170, s. 10. Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.